District of Columbia statutes.
31-2501.01

Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Fire and Casualty Act.”

History

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1063, ch. 792, ch. I, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-5031.01, § 31-5031.02, and § 31-5031.24.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1501.
1973 Ed., § 35-1301.